Massachusetts, session 194th, H3004.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59 of the general laws is hereby amended by inserting Section 5O, as appearing
in the 2019 official edition, to read as
follows:
Section 5O. With respect to each parcel of real property classified as Class One,
residential, in each city or town certified by the commissioner
to be assessing all property at its full and fair cash valuation, and at the option of the
board of selectmen or mayor, with the approval of the city
council, as the case may be, there shall be an exemption equal to not more than 35 per
cent of the average assessed value of all Class One,
of 4

residential, parcels within such city or town; provided, however, that such an exemption
shall be applied only to the principal residence of a
Senior Citizen taxpayer of age 70 or more, as used by the taxpayer for income tax
purposes. This exemption shall be in addition to any
exemptions allowable under section five; provided, however, that in no instance shall the
taxable valuation of such property after all applicable
exemptions be reduced below ten per cent of its full and fair cash valuation, except
through the applicability of clause Eighteenth of
section five. Where, under the provisions of section five, the exemption is based upon an
amount of tax rather than on valuation, the reduction
of taxable valuation for purposes of the preceding sentence shall be computed by dividing
the said amount of tax by the residential class tax
rate of the city or town and multiplying the result by one thousand dollars. For purposes
of this paragraph, ''parcel'' shall mean a unit of real
property as defined by the assessors in accordance with the deed for such property and
shall include a condominium unit.
In those cities and towns in which an exemption is made available hereunder, the Senior
Citizen taxpayer aggrieved by the failure to receive
such residential exemption may apply for such residential exemption to the assessors, in
writing, on a form approved by the commissioner, on
of 4

or before the deadline for an application for exemption under section 59.
A timely application filed hereunder shall, for the purposes of this chapter, be treated as a
timely filed application pursuant to section fifty-nine.
For purposes of this section, with respect to real property owned by a cooperative
corporation, as defined in section 4 of chapter 157B, that portion
which is occupied by a Senior Citizen member, of age 70 or more, pursuant to a
proprietary lease as such member's domicile and is used as such member's
principal residence for income tax purposes shall be deemed to be real property owned by
such member for purposes of this section, provided that the portion
of the real estate is represented by the member's share or shares of stock in the
cooperative corporation and the percentage of such portion to the whole is the
percentage of such member's shares in the cooperative corporation to the total
outstanding stock of the corporation, including shares owned by the
corporation. Such portion of such real property shall be eligible for exemption from
taxation pursuant to this section if such member meets all requirements for
such exemption. Any exemption so provided shall reduce the taxable valuation of the real
property owned by the cooperative corporation; provided, however,
that the reduction in taxes realized thereby shall be credited by the cooperative
corporation against the amount of such taxes otherwise payable by or chargeable to such
member. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to affect the tax status of any
of 4

manufactured home or mobile home under this chapter, but shall apply to the land on which such
manufactured home or mobile home is located if all other requirements of this paragraph are met.
This paragraph shall take effect in a city or town upon its acceptance by the city or town.
of 4